New Jersey, session 221, A4544.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, 1, and subject to the availability of funds appropriated in the annual appropriations act for the purposes on this section,1 the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services shall expand the work, school, and training eligibility requirements of the States child care assistance program to include that an applicant who is a full-time graduate 1[and] student or a full-time1 post-graduate student shall be eligible to participate in the program, provided that the applicant meets all other eligible criteria regarding income, assets, and residency. b.  As used in this section: Full-time graduate 1[and post-graduate]1 student means an individual 1[that] who1 has been accepted to pursue a course of graduate 1[or post-graduate]1 study at a public or private institution of higher education and 1[are] is1 enrolled as 1a1 graduate 1[or post-graduate students] student1 in good standing at that institution. 1Full-time post-graduate student means an individual who has been accepted to pursue a course of post-graduate study at a public or private institution of higher education and is enrolled as a post-graduate student in good standing at that institution.1 2.  The Department of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to secure federal financial participation for State expenditures under the Child Care and Development Block Grant. 3.  The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.